Hawaii statutes.
§333F-8 Rights of persons with developmental
or intellectual disabilities. (a) Persons with developmental or
intellectual disabilities shall have the following rights:

(1) To receive the least restrictive, individually
appropriate services, including a program of activities outside the residence
in accordance with the person's individualized service plan;

(2) To reside in the least restrictive, individually
appropriate residential alternative located as close as possible to the person's
home community within the State;

(3) To the extent it is individually appropriate as
decided after due consideration afforded the preferences of the person with developmental
or intellectual disabilities, to:

(A) Interact with persons without
disabilities in a nontreatment, nonservice-oriented setting;

(B) Live with, or in close proximity to,
persons without disabilities; and

(C) Live in a setting which closely
approximates those conditions available to persons without disabilities of the
same age;

(4) To reasonable access to review medical, service,
and treatment files and to be informed of diagnoses;

(5) To develop a plan with the input of family and
friends that identifies the supports needed to accomplish the plan rather than
purchase a program;

(6) To control, with the help of family and friends
as necessary, an identified amount of dollars to accomplish the plan;

(7) To direct the provision of resources, both paid
and unpaid, that will assist an individual with a disability to live a life in
the community rich in community association and contribution;

(8) To a valued role in the community through
employment, participation in community activities, volunteering, including
being accountable for spending public dollars in ways that are life enhancing;
and

(9) To privacy and confidentiality, to the extent
possible, in connection with services provided to the person.

(b) Rights listed in this chapter shall not be
construed to replace or limit any other rights, benefits, or privileges,
including other statutory and regulatory due process rights and protections, to
which a person with a developmental or intellectual disability may be entitled.

(c) The enumeration or granting of these
rights does not guarantee the provision of services. [L 1987, c 341, pt of §2;
am L 1995, c 189, §7; am L 1998, c 133, §4; am L 2011, c 220, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next